Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1628
Bonds; issuance; approval by district court.

The board of trustees of a road improvement district organized under the provisions of sections 39-1601 to 39-1636 shall, before issuing any bonds of such district, commence special proceedings, as provided for by section 39-1629, in and by which the proceedings of the board and of the district providing for and authorizing the issuance of the bonds of the district shall be judicially examined, approved, and confirmed, or disapproved and disaffirmed.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. III, § 28, p. 536.